Missouri, session 2026, HB3279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 620.580, 620.582, 620.584, 620.586, 620.588, 620.590, and
620.592, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 173.4000, 173.4002, 173.4004, 173.4006, 173.4008, 173.4010, and 173.4012, to read
as follows:
[620.580.] 173.4000. Sections [620.580] 173.4000 to [620.592] 173.4012 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Missouri Community Service Act".
[620.582.] 173.4002. As used in sections [620.580] 173.4000 to [620.592] 173.4012,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Act", the national and community service act of 1990, as amended;
(2) "Commission", the Missouri community service commission created by sections
[620.580] 173.4000 to [620.592] 173.4012;
(3) "Community service programs", the performance of tasks designed primarily to
address educational, public safety, human, or environmental needs at a local, regional, state,
or multistate level;
(4) "Corporation", the corporation for national and community service authorized by
the act;
(5) "National service laws", the act and other federal legislation that authorizes or
may authorize community service activities in states;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3279 2
(6) "National service position", a placement in a community service program
whereby an individual may earn an educational award, as authorized by the act.
[620.584.] 173.4004. 1. The Missouri community service commission is assigned to
the department of [economic development] higher education and workforce development.
2. The commission is established to make community service the common
expectation and experience of all Missourians with a special concentration on Missouri's
young people. The commission shall focus its efforts primarily on issues related to education,
public safety, human needs, and the environment.
3. The commission shall work to renew the ethic of civic responsibility in Missouri
and to involve and enroll citizens in service opportunities that benefit Missouri while offering
citizens skills that can be used to further their own plans for education, for a career, or for
continuing community services. The commission shall build on the existing organizational
framework of state, local, and community-based programs and agencies to expand full-time
and part-time service opportunities for all citizens, but particularly Missouri's youth.
[620.586.] 173.4006. 1. The commission shall include at least fifteen, but no more
than nineteen, voting members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate. The commission shall include the following voting members:
(1) A representative of local government;
(2) The commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education or
the designee of such person;
(3) An individual with experience in promoting the involvement of older adults in
service and volunteerism;
(4) A representative of a national service program;
(5) An individual with expertise in the educational, training, and development needs
of youth, particularly disadvantaged youth;
(6) An individual between the ages of sixteen and twenty-five years who is a
participant in or supervisor of a service program for school-age youth, or a campus-based or
national service program;
(7) A representative of community-based agencies or organizations in the state;
(8) A representative of labor organizations;
(9) A member representing the business community;
(10) The lieutenant governor or his or her designee;
(11) A representative of the volunteer sector; and
(12) Between four and eight other members, appointed by the governor, provided that
no more than twenty percent of the voting members are officers or employees of the state, and
provided further that not more than fifty percent plus one of the voting members of the
commission are members of the same political party.

HB 3279 3
2. The commission shall include at least one nonvoting, ex officio member who shall
be a representative from the corporation for national and community service. The governor
may appoint any number of other nonvoting, ex officio members who shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor.
3. Appointments to the commission shall reflect the race, ethnicity, age, gender, and
disability characteristics of the population of the state as a whole.
4. Voting members shall serve renewable terms of three years, except that of the first
members appointed, one-third shall serve for a term of one year, one-third shall serve for a
term of two years, and one-third shall serve for a term of three years. If a commission
vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term. Vacancies shall not affect the power of the remaining members to execute
the commission's duties.
5. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services
on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties.
6. The voting members of the commission shall elect one of their members to serve as
chairperson of the commission. The voting members may elect such other officers as deemed
necessary.
7. The commission shall meet at least quarterly.
[620.588.] 173.4008. 1. The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To ensure that its funding decisions meet all federal and state statutory
requirements;
(2) To prepare for this state an annual national service plan that follows state and
federal guidelines;
(3) To recommend innovative statewide service programs to increase volunteer
participation and community-based problem solving by all age groups and among diverse
participants;
(4) To utilize local, state, and federal resources to initiate, strengthen, and expand
quality service programs;
(5) To promote interagency collaboration to maximize resources and develop a model
of such collaboration on the state level;
(6) To oversee the application process to apply for corporation grants and funds, and
for approval of service positions;
(7) To establish priorities, policies, and procedures for the use of funds received under
national service laws and for funds deposited into the community service commission fund
established in section [620.592] 173.4012;

HB 3279 4
(8) To provide technical assistance for applicants to plan and implement service
programs and to apply for assistance under the national service laws;
(9) To solicit and accept gifts, contributions, grants, bequests, or other aid from any
person, business, organization or foundation, public or private, and from federal, state or local
government or any agency of federal, state or local government.
2. The commission shall have other powers and duties in addition to those listed in
subsection 1 of this section, including:
(1) To utilize staff within the department of [economic development] higher
education and workforce development, the office of a designated statewide elected official,
or other executive departments as needed for this purpose; and
(2) To enter into contracts with individuals, organizations, and institutions within
amounts available for this purpose.
[620.590.] 173.4010. 1. All state agencies, the University of Missouri extension
system, and any unit of local government, including school districts, may share information
and cooperate with the commission to enable it to perform the functions assigned to it by state
and federal law.
2. Any state agency that operates or plans to establish a community service program
may coordinate its efforts with the commission.
[620.592.] 173.4012. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Community
Service Commission Fund". The state treasurer shall deposit to the credit of the fund all
moneys which may be appropriated to it by the general assembly and also any gifts,
contributions, grants, bequests, or other aid received from federal, private, or other sources.
The general assembly may appropriate moneys into the fund for the support of the
commission and its activities. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, moneys in the fund shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund at the
end of the biennium.
2. The commission shall submit an annual report of its activities to the speaker of the
house of representatives, the president pro tem of the senate, and the governor before January
thirty-first of each year.
✔